Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3809
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2025, LB21, § 9.